Utah statutes.
53A-21-302.   Capital Outlay Enrollment Growth Program -- Distribution formulas -- Allocations.

(1)  For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2008, the State Board of Education shall annually allocate appropriated funds to eligible school districts in accordance with Subsection (2).

(2)  The State Board of Education shall allocate to an eligible school district an amount equal to the product of:

(a)  the quotient of:

(i)  the eligible school district's average annual net enrollment increase; divided by

(ii)  the sum of the average annual net enrollment increase in all eligible school districts; and

(b)  the total amount appropriated for the Capital Outlay Enrollment Growth Program in that fiscal year.



Enacted by Chapter 236, 2008 General Session

